Utah statutes.
31A-19a-403.   Definitions.

As used in this part:

(1)  "Uniform classification plan," in addition to the definition of "classification system" in Section 31A-19a-102, means a plan:

(a)  that is consistent between all insurers of classification codes and descriptions; and

(b)  by which like workers' compensation exposures are grouped for the purposes of underwriting, rating, and statistical reporting.

(2)  "Uniform experience rating plan" means a plan that is consistent between all insurers for experience rating entities insured for workers' compensation insurance.

(3)  "Uniform statistical plan" means a plan that is consistent between all insurers that is used for the reporting of workers' compensation insurance statistical data.

